Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB563.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 40.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person determined by the administrator to be a qualified veteran shall be paid
the sum of nine dollars ($9) for each month and major fraction of a month of active
duty, in the Armed Forces in the continental United States, not to exceed in all the
sum of three hundred dollars ($300), and the sum of fifteen dollars ($15) for each
month and major fraction of a month of such service outside the continental United
States, subject to an aggregate limit for all service in the sum of five hundred
dollars ($500). A veteran who served in one (1) or more of the conflict periods
defined in subsections (15), (16), (17), and (18) of KRS 40.010 shall be limited to a
maximum payment of three hundred dollars ($300) if no part of his or her total
service during the periods specified was served outside the continental United
States, or five hundred dollars ($500) if a part of his or her total service during the
periods specified was served outside the continental United States.
(2) If a person determined to have been a qualified veteran shall be deceased at the time
payment of the veterans' bonus would otherwise be made to him or her, the amount
of his or her bonus shall be paid to the first surviving beneficiary, if any, according
to the order of priority defined in subsection (8) of KRS 40.010, and if there be no
surviving beneficiary, the bonus of such veteran shall lapse, and no payment thereof
shall be made.
(3) A beneficiary, [(]as defined in subsections (8), (9), (10), (11), and (12) of KRS
40.010,[)] of a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed
Forces during the periods defined in subsections (15), (16), (17), and (18) of KRS
40.010, or of a person who died of service-connected injury sustained while on
active duty in the Armed Forces during the conflict periods defined above, shall be
paid three hundred dollars ($300) if no part of his or her total service during these
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/12/2024 9:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 846
periods was served outside the continental United States or five hundred dollars
($500) if any part of his or her total service during these periods was served outside
the continental United States. The provisions of subsection (1) of this section and
the minimum period of service for entitlement to a bonus as established by
subsection (2) of KRS 40.010 shall not apply to these beneficiaries. However, this
exception does not waive the respective maximums of three hundred dollars ($300)
or five hundred dollars ($500) for each veteran, person killed in the line of duty
while on active duty in the Armed Forces, or person who died as a result of service-
connected injury sustained while on active duty in the Armed Forces.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/12/2024 9:09 AM Jacketed